Massachusetts, session 194th, H483.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 23N of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended in line 121 by inserting after the words “or other event” the following words:-
such as, but not limited to, the result of an official coin toss or the length of a national
anthem performance at an athletic event, provided that the gaming commission may set limits on
such wagers if it sees fit.
of 1